Utah statutes.
36-1-104.   Omissions from maps -- How resolved.
(1)  If any area of the state is omitted from a Utah State Senate district in
the maps enacted by the Legislature, the county clerk of the affected county,
upon discovery of the omission, shall attach the area to the appropriate
Senate district according to the requirements of Subsections (2) and (3).
(2)  If the area is surrounded by a Senate district, the area shall be
attached to that district.
(3)  If the area is contiguous to two districts, the area shall be attached to
the district that has the least population, as determined by the census
population figures and maps of the Bureau of the Census of the United States
Department of Commerce developed in connection with the taking of the 2000
national decennial census.
(4)  Any attachment made under Subsection (1) shall be certified in writing
and filed with the lieutenant governor.
